Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.150.360

Adjustments to meet emergencies.

In the event of an unforeseen emergency, in the nature of either an unavoidable cost to a district or unexpected variation in anticipated revenues to a district, the state superintendent is authorized, for not to exceed two years, to make such an adjustment in the allocation of funds as is consistent with the intent of this chapter, RCW 28A.160.150 through 28A.160.210, 28A.300.170, and 28A.500.010 in providing an equal educational opportunity for the children of such district or districts.

[ 1995 c 335 s 101; 1990 c 33 s 113; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.41.150. Prior: 1965 ex.s. c 154 s 4. Formerly RCW 28A.41.150, 28.41.150.]

NOTES:

Part headings, table of contents not law—1995 c 335: "Part headings and the table of contents as used in this act do not constitute any part of the law." [ 1995 c 335 s 805.]